Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 560 to 572; 64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations § 1 et seq.; 70A Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessments § 1 et seq.

64 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 1116 et seq.

§ 15-7-101.
Purposes.

In addition to all other powers provided by law, any city or town may make public improvements as follows for which bonds may be issued to the contractor or be sold as provided in this chapter to:

Pave any street or streets in front of or adjacent to any public hospital or institution within the city or town;

Establish, construct, purchase, extend, maintain and regulate a system of water works, for the purpose of supplying water for extinguishing fires and for domestic, manufacturing and other purposes. To carry out this power, or to prevent pollution or injury to the streams, springs or source of supply of its water works, ditches or reservoirs, any city or town may go beyond its corporate limits and take, hold and acquire property by purchase or otherwise and may take and condemn all necessary land and property. Jurisdiction of a city or town shall extend up and along the stream or source of supply for the entire distance occupied by such water works, ditches or reservoirs. Cities or towns may enact ordinances and make all necessary rules and regulations for the government and protection of their water works, ditches and reservoirs, and fix water rates and provide for their collection. All water rent collected except the amount required to pay the expense of maintaining, extending and improving the water works, shall become a part of the water bond fund, and be applied only to the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds issued for the construction, purchase, maintaining or extension of the water works;

Take any action necessary to establish, purchase, extend, maintain and regulate a water system for supplying water to and diverting surface water runoff from its inhabitants and their property and for any other public purposes, including:

Condemnation of property;

Prescribing and regulating of rates for the use of water and diversion or management of surface water runoff; and

Enacting ordinances for their enforcement and collection.

Establish, construct, purchase, extend, maintain and regulate a system of sewerage;

Establish, maintain and regulate electric light plants and electric power plants to supply the inhabitants with electric lights and power, to light the streets, highways and public buildings, and supply power for water works and other municipally owned works and utilities;

Establish, construct, purchase or extend electric transmission lines or electric power lines, to carry electric current to the city or town, from the place the current is obtained;

Establish, construct, purchase or extend propane, butane and natural gas distribution systems or lines and to carry propane, butane and natural gas to the city or town, from the place of origin or where the propane, butane or natural gas is obtained;

Erect, construct or purchase buildings for housing its fire extinguishing equipment and for the use of its fire department and officers in the transaction of their official business;

Contract for, purchase and hold lands and water rights and erect thereon amusement halls and buildings to be used for public parks and grounds for the use, benefit and enjoyment of the public, and:

Enact ordinances, and make all necessary rules and regulations for the protection, maintenance and beautification of any park located within or without the limits of the city or town;

Establish, purchase and hold parks on lands outside the corporate limits, if the lands are within thirty (30) miles of the city or town limits.

Designate, establish, construct, purchase, extend, maintain and regulate arterial streets and highways, highway viaducts and subways within the corporate limits of the city or town;

Plan, create, construct and equip liquid and solid waste facilities. To carry out this power or to prevent pollution or injury to the environment, any city or town may go beyond its corporate limits and take, hold and acquire property by purchase or otherwise, or in joint effort with cities, towns, counties or special districts. Cities or towns may enact ordinances and make all necessary rules and regulations for the government and protection of liquid and solid waste disposal facilities, and fix rates and provide for collection and disposal;

Establish and defray the cost of purchasing land for, and the erection of a city library or additions to existing city libraries, or to establish art galleries or museums;

Establish and defray the cost of purchasing land for, and the construction of swimming pools, wading pools and other related recreational facilities;

Take any action necessary to acquire any needed or useful property, or construct, maintain, repair or replace any lawful improvement, development, project or other activity of any kind or to participate, join or cooperate with other governments or political subdivisions, departments or agencies thereof, for which funds may be borrowed from the United States of America or the state of Wyoming, or any subdivision, department or agency of either;

Construct, extend, improve, furnish, equip or otherwise acquire a city or town hall complex, including buildings and other structures for the use of city or town officers or employees in the transaction of their official business, for community meeting rooms, and for all other municipal or other public purpose activities;

Plan, create, construct and equip a fiber optic communications system.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 410; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-410; Laws 1969, ch. 198, § 1; 1973, ch. 6, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2; 1997, ch. 143, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2020 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

made minor stylistic changes.

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a)(iii) substituted “and diverting surface water runoff from its inhabitants and their property” for “its inhabitants”; and in (a)(iii)(B), added “and diversion or management of surface water runoff” following “use of water.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Question of necessity for improvement deemed legislative. —

Question of necessity for making proposed improvements for which property may be taken under the power of eminent domain is purely legislative and, in the absence of constitutional or statutory provisions to the contrary, when, where and in what manner they shall be constructed are matters resting exclusively with municipal authorities. Edwards v. City of Cheyenne, 19 Wyo. 110, 114 P. 677,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1911).

Additional statutory limitations on indebtedness permissible.—

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Sufficiency of specification in bond issue. —

Rate of interest was sufficiently specified by ordinance and notice submitting proposition to issue bonds for certain public improvements stating that bonds would “bear interest at a rate not exceeding 5% per annum.” City of Cheyenne v. State, 17 Wyo. 90, 96 P. 244,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1908).

Use of the statements “not exceeding 5 percent per annum” and “not to exceed $60,000” sufficiently complied with statute requiring that rate of interest and amount of bond issue must be specified. First Nat'l Bank v. Laramie, 25 Wyo. 267, 168 P. 728,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1917).

Transmittal of funds to pay bonds without security. —

The mayor and city council are authorized to make city's bonds and interest coupons payable in such place as they see fit, and to indicate by ordinance to that effect. Failure of council in its contract with its fiscal agent in New York to demand security, relieved city treasurer from duty of making such demand, and he was justified in transmitting moneys to such agent to pay bonds and coupons, without liability for loss sustained by failure of such agent. City of Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

Taxing each lot same amount for irrigation water. —

City council was not authorized to pass ordinance taxing each lot certain amount for water for irrigation, regardless of value of property. Town Council of Hudson v. Board of Comm'rs, 37 Wyo. 160, 259 P. 1051,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1927).

Municipalities have full authority and control over public water and sewerage systems.

Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Including levy of connection and maintenance charges. —

Wyoming statutory provisions grant a city the power to levy sewer and water connection charges and to charge users of the systems in order to pay the costs of maintaining, operating, and expanding them. Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Storm sewers authorized. —

In view of the fact that storm sewers may subserve the purposes of health as well as sanitary sewers, storm sewers come within the constitutional and statutory provisions authorizing indebtedness for construction of sewers. Anselmi v. Rock Springs, 53 Wyo. 223, 80 P.2d 419,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1938).

Legislative grant of power as to light facilities. —

Act of 1907 authorizing municipalities to construct light and power plants, granted new power and was not merely providing method of exercising power that already existed. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Relation of other provision. —

Section 15-7-204(a) implements the express powers granted cities and towns to establish light plants and transmission lines to bring electricity from the place obtained, granted by this section. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Power to purchase public utility plant accorded cities and towns by former §§ 1-26-104 to 1-26-110 did not imply a power also to finance that purchase in a manner which legislature had persistently refused to recognize. Jensen v. Afton, 59 Wyo. 500, 143 P.2d 190,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1943).

Town did not have power to issue revenue bonds to purchase power company property, especially where such property had over half the assessed value of all taxable property and town already had bonded indebtedness of $53,000 and the school district, of $66,000. Jensen v. Town of Afton, 59 Wyo. 500, 143 P.2d 190,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1943).

Fixed rate formula in power contract held reasonable. —

Fixed rate formula agreed upon in a power contract between municipalities organizing an agency under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act (§§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

) to produce and distribute electric power to their inhabitants was reasonable. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Gas plant not provided for. —

Revision committee while providing for bonds issued for purchase or construction of waterworks and electric power plants failed to make any such provision for purchase of or construction of gas plants. Lakota Oil & Gas Co. v. Casper, 57 Wyo. 329, 116 P.2d 861,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1941).

Park-land dedication ordinances. —

The broad powers delegated by the legislature can fairly encompass the power to adopt a park-land dedication ordinance. A city can require the payment of a sum in lieu of park-land dedication in order to lessen the impact and pressure on park facilities that results from the influx of inhabitants caused by a new development. The limitation on this power is the requirement that any fees collected in lieu of land dedication must be earmarked to accounts for the purpose of acquiring needed park land and maintenance of existing park facilities. Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Prior park dedication legal despite lack of specific power.—

Where land owned by city had been dedicated by it for park purposes more than 50 years previously, the park was legally dedicated even though at that time no specific power had been granted by the legislature to cities to acquire and hold property for park purposes. Rayor v. Cheyenne, 63 Wyo. 72, 178 P.2d 115,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1947).

Applied

in

Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978); City of Green River v. Debernardi Constr. Co., 816 P.2d 1287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Municipal Action Exemption to the Federal Antitrust Laws: Increased Antitrust Exposure for Wyoming Cities and Towns,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 673 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of municipality to sell, lease or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein, 61 ALR2d 595.

§ 15-7-102.
Borrowing and issuance of bonds; generally; sewerage systems; elections.

A city or town may borrow money and issue bonds in either coupon or registered form to any amount not exceeding the limitation provided in W.S.

15-7-109

for the purposes enumerated in this article. The amount of bonds may be any multiple of one hundred dollars ($100.00), as provided in the ordinance authorizing their issuance, and shall bear interest payable annually or semiannually at a rate, at a place and in the manner as the ordinance provides. The bonds may be redeemed before maturity at a time or times and in a manner as the governing body determines, and payable in not more than thirty (30) years after the date of their issuance, or payable serially at times in regular numerical order at annual or other designated intervals in any amounts designated and fixed by the governing body. However bonds issued by a city or town to establish, construct, purchase or extend a system of sewerage may mature and be payable at any time not more than forty (40) years from their date or the estimated life of the improvement whichever is shorter.

No bonds may be issued for the purposes provided in this article until the proposition to issue them has been submitted to and approved by the qualified electors of the city or town at an election which shall be called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

Notwithstanding any provision of W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

, for purposes of this section, where repayment of funds borrowed from the United States of America or from the state of Wyoming, or from any subdivision, agency or department of either, is to be made solely from revenues generated by the enterprise with which the financed public improvement project is associated and where security for the loan is restricted to a claim on the revenues generated from the enterprise with which the proposed public improvement project is associated and to the assets of that enterprise, any document evidencing the agreement to repay the borrowed funds shall not be considered a bond and no election shall be required.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 411; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-411; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 5; 1979, ch. 30, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1999, ch. 107, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to bond elections, see §§

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Additional statutory limitations permissible. —

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Financing of water project not a “bond.” —

Legislature did not intend for financing of municipal water project to be considered a “bond” under this section, and therefore there was no statutory requirement for an election prior to town's incurring debt. Cooper v. Town of Pinedale, 1 P.3d 1197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2000).

Bond sale of corporation “on behalf of” city invalid. —

A bond sale by a nonprofit corporation “on behalf of” a city is invalid as a loan of the city's credit in violation of art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const."Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Transmittal of funds without requiring security. —

Mayor and city council were authorized to make the city's bonds and interest coupons payable in such place as they saw fit, and to indicate by ordinance to that effect. Failure of council in its contract with fiscal agent in New York to demand security, relieved the city treasurer from the duty of making such demand and he was justified in transmitting moneys to such agent to pay bonds and coupons, and was not liable for any loss sustained by the failure of such agent. City of Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

Substantial compliance with election provisions sufficient. —

A statute authorizing issuance of bonds for public improvements should be construed so as not to defeat the manifest object of the enactment, and hence a substantial compliance with the formalities in submitting the question of a bond issue to the voters is generally sufficient. City of Cheyenne v. State, 17 Wyo. 90, 96 P. 244,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1908).

Compliance found. —

Statement in an ordinance submitting the proposition of an issuance of bonds to extend the water system, and in the election notice and official ballot, “in an amount not to exceed $60,000.00” was a compliance with the statute requiring the amount of proposed bonds to be stated. First Nat'l Bank v. Laramie, 25 Wyo. 267, 168 P. 728,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1917).

An ordinance directing issuance of bonds and a notice of special election submitting the proposition to the electors specifying that bonds to be issued were to bear interest at a rate not exceeding five percent per annum sufficiently specified rate of interest so as to render bonds issued pursuant thereto and bearing five percent interest valid. City of Cheyenne v. State, 17 Wyo. 90, 96 P. 244,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1908).

Bond election not vitiated by mere irregularities. —

Misstatement as to amount of city's indebtedness contained in notice of bond election for the issuance of sewer bonds, not being a necessary part of the notice, in the absence of proof that the result of the election was affected thereby, is treated as a mere irregularity neither vitiating the election, nor the bond issue. Anselmi v. Rock Springs, 53 Wyo. 223, 80 P.2d 419,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1938).

Under allegations that notice of bond election was misleading, and that more than one ballot was given an elector, it was held that the burden was upon the petitioner to show that these affected the result of the election, all presumptions being in favor of the validity of the election which will not be vitiated by mere irregularities. Anselmi v. Rock Springs, 53 Wyo. 223, 80 P.2d 419,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1938).

§ 15-7-103.
Borrowing and issuance of bonds; recreational facilities.

A city or town may borrow money and issue coupon bonds in an amount which, together with the municipal indebtedness, but not including sewerage, water supply and school bonds, does not exceed four percent (4%) of the assessed valuation of the city or town to acquire, lease, purchase, equip, construct, develop, improve or enlarge public recreational facilities. The bonds shall be in the denomination of one hundred dollars ($100.00), or multiples thereof and bear interest payable semiannually at a rate, at a place and in the manner the governing body provides. The bonds shall be in a serial form with last maturity not more than twenty (20) years after the date of issue and are redeemable at the option of the city or town at a time to be designated by the governing body as provided in W.S.

16-5-302

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 412; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-412; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 6; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to vacation from public use of public parks, see §§

15-7-301

to

15-7-305

.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, made stylistic change.

Section does not repeal or limit other provisions. —

This section does not expressly or by implication repeal or limit the authority delegated by §§

18-9-201

,

18-9-202

, or any other grants of authority by the state, as to recreational facilities, nor does it directly or by implication declare recreational facilities to be a strictly municipal function. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

§ 15-7-104.
Borrowing and issuance of bonds; fire prevention.

A city or town may borrow money and issue the coupon bonds in an amount not exceeding at one (1) time, four percent (4%) of the assessed valuation of the city or town to acquire and purchase supplies, equipment and apparatus for fire prevention and control and to erect, construct or purchase buildings for housing its fire extinguishing equipment and for the use of its fire department in the transaction of its official business. The bonds shall bear interest payable semiannually, be of the denomination and be payable at a rate, at a place and in the manner the governing body provides. The bonds shall be redeemable after ten (10) years and payable in not more than thirty (30) years after the time they are issued or payable serially, as provided in W.S.

16-5-302

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 413; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-413; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 7; 1973, ch. 6, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 1993, ch. 29, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Transmittal of funds to pay bonds without security. —

Mayor and city council were authorized to make city's bonds and interest coupons payable in such place as they saw fit, and to indicate by ordinance to that effect. Failure of council in its contract with its fiscal agent in New York to demand security relieved city treasurer from duty of making such demand and he was justified in transmitting moneys to such agent to pay bonds and coupons without liability for loss sustained by the failure of such agent. City of Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

§ 15-7-105.
Bonds; endorsed certificate; registration book.

The clerk of the city or town shall endorse a certificate upon every bond or evidence of debt issued, stating that it is within the lawful debt limit of the city or town and is issued according to law. He shall sign the certificate in his official character.

The city or town treasurer shall keep a book in which shall be registered all bonds issued, showing the number of the bond, the date of issue, to whom issued, the amount, date of redemption and payment of interest. The book shall be open to all persons for examination in accordance with W.S.

16-4-202

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 414, 415; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-414, 15.1-415; W.S. 1977, §§

15-7-105

,

15-7-106

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 15, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision to same effect as subsection (a) of this section, see art. 16, § 8, Wyo. Const.

Ordinance constitutes “law” under state constitution. —

Town ordinance requiring mayor to sign certificate such as mentioned in section, there being at time of its passage no statutory provision thereon, constituted a “law” under constitutional requirement that bonds of political subdivisions must have certificate endorsed thereon. Diefenderfer v. State, 14 Wyo. 302, 83 P. 591,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1906).

Additional statutory limitations permissible. —

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 15-7-106.
Bonds; notice; receiving bids; exception; limitation; private sale.

After any bonds to be issued for any of the purposes set forth in this article, other than special improvement bonds, have been approved by a vote of the people, the governing body shall give notice by advertisement for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the city or town, if there is one, and if not, then in some newspaper of general circulation in the city or town, and in any newspaper published in other places as may be deemed expedient. The notice shall state that the city or town will receive bids for the sale of the bonds and shall give the time and place where bids will be received and opened. No bonds may be sold for less than their par value.

Bonds issued by a city or town to establish, construct, purchase or extend a system of sewerage may be sold to the state of Wyoming or the United States of America at a private sale, without advertisement, for not less than par and accrued interest.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 416; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-416; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-107

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-107.
Bonds; tax; interest; sinking fund; redemption.

A tax to be fixed by ordinance shall be levied each year to pay the interest on the bonds and to create a sinking fund for their redemption. The money that may be on hand at any time belonging to the sinking fund, until there are bonds redeemable, may be loaned or invested by the governing body in any public securities of the state, any subdivision thereof, or of the United States, and the interest that accrues shall be added to the sinking fund. If at any time after ten (10) years from the issue of the bonds the sum in the sinking fund equals or exceeds five hundred dollars ($500.00), and from time to time thereafter when it accrues, the city or town treasurer shall publish a notice in a newspaper in the city or town that, thirty (30) days from the date of the notice, he will redeem the amount of bonds then payable, giving their number and giving preference to the oldest issue. If at the expiration of thirty (30) days the holder of those bonds fails to present them for payment, the interest thereon ceases, but the treasurer shall redeem them on presentation. A copy of the notice shall be sent to the bank designated as the place of payment of the interest on the bonds.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 417; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-417; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-108

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Additional statutory limitations permissible. —

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 15-7-108.
Bonds; cancellation.

The city or town treasurer shall, as soon as the coupons of bonds are paid, cause the word “paid” to be cut into them, and when the bonds are paid cause the word “paid” to be cut in the body of the bond.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 418; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-418; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-109

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Additional statutory limitations permissible. —

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 15-7-109.
Limitations on indebtedness; exceptions.

No debt in excess of the taxes for the current year may be created by any city or town, except local improvements as provided by law, unless the proposition to create the debt is approved by a vote of the people. No city or town may create any indebtedness exceeding four percent (4%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property except an additional indebtedness not exceeding four percent (4%) of the assessed valuation of the property may be created to build and construct sewerage systems. This limitation does not apply to the construction, establishing, extending and maintaining of water works and supplying water for the use of the city or town and its inhabitants.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 419; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-419; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-110

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to limitation on municipal indebtedness, see art. 16, §§ 4 and 5, Wyo. Const.

Storm sewers authorized. —

In view of the fact that storm sewers may subserve the purposes of health as well as sanitary sewers, storm sewers come within the constitutional and statutory provisions authorizing indebtedness for construction of sewers. Anselmi v. Rock Springs, 53 Wyo. 223, 80 P.2d 419,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1938).

Cited

in

Cooper v. Town of Pinedale, 1 P.3d 1197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2000); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 15-7-110.
Custody of funds.

The city or town treasurer is the custodian of all monies arising from the sale of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter. He shall give any additional bond or bonds as the governing body requires for safekeeping and disbursing of all such funds.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 420; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-420; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-111

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Additional statutory limitations permissible. —

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 15-7-111.
Bonds for municipal improvements; exception; procedure.

Any city or town may issue and sell revenue bonds for the purpose of creating, purchasing, leasing, constructing, maintaining, expanding or improving the following types of municipal improvements:

Municipal auditoriums or community meeting facilities;

Land, equipment, municipal incinerators and other necessary improvements and facilities to be used for or in conjunction with municipal solid waste management systems;

Municipally operated recreational facilities of a type for which a charge is or may be made to the general public and because of the charge they are or may be self-liquidating in nature;

Municipally owned and operated propane, butane and natural gas distribution systems and lines, except no revenue bonds shall be issued or sold for the purpose of purchasing or in any manner acquiring the ownership of an existing natural gas distribution system or lines;

Electrical systems and any facilities located within or without the state for the generation, transmission or distribution of electrical energy, provided that this paragraph shall only apply to those municipalities that owned their electrical systems prior to March 1, 1975. No revenue bonds shall be issued or sold for the purpose of purchasing or in any manner acquiring the ownership of an existing electrical system.

Any city or town desiring to issue revenue bonds shall adopt and follow the procedure prescribed for the issuance by municipalities of revenue bonds for sewerage systems.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 421; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-421; Laws 1969, ch. 198, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-112

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2003, ch. 28, § 1; 2004, ch. 18, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(v).

§ 15-7-112.
Borrowing and issuance of bonds for airports; generally.

In addition to all other powers, a city or town may borrow money and issue coupon bonds in an amount not exceeding, at one (1) time, four percent (4%) of the assessed valuation of the city or town to acquire, lease, purchase, equip, develop, improve or enlarge municipal airports, landing fields or other air navigation facilities. The bonds shall be of the denomination of five hundred dollars ($500.00), or multiples thereof, and bear interest at a rate payable semiannually, at the place and in the manner provided by the governing body. The bonds shall be in serial form with last maturity not more than thirty (30) years after the date of issue. The bonds are redeemable at a time designated by the governing body as provided in W.S.

16-5-302

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 422; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-422; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 8; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-113

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

For authority of municipalities to issue bonds generally, see §

15-1-103

.

As to municipal and county airports generally, see §

10-5-101

et seq.

As to county airports, see §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-202

.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Constitutionality. —

This section, authorizing the issuance of airport bonds by cities and towns in an amount not exceeding four percent of the assessed valuation of such city or town, was construed by the supreme court to permit issuance of bonds to the extent of two percent in order to preserve the constitutionality of the section in view of art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const., which prior to 1962 imposed a two percent limitation on cities, towns and villages, with certain exceptions. Hanson v. Greybull, 63 Wyo. 467, 183 P.2d 393,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1947).

The words appearing in the first sentence of this section, and reading, “not exceeding, at one (1) time,” might be misleading and seem to authorize the creation of indebtedness of the stated percentage for other times regardless of the fact that the statutory percentage limit has been attained. But to so read the statute would be to disregard the elementary principle that it will not be presumed that the legislature intended to enact a law in violation of constitutional restrictions. The words “at one (1) time” could very well have been omitted. Hanson v. Greybull, 63 Wyo. 467, 183 P.2d 393,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1947).

§ 15-7-113.
Borrowing and issuance of bonds for airports; notice; receiving bids.

If a majority of the votes are “for the bonds,” the governing body shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town, and any other newspapers published in other places as deemed expedient, to the effect that the city or town will receive bids for the sale of the bonds and stating the time and place where bids will be received and opened.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 423; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-423; W.S. 1977, §

15-7-114

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-114.
Borrowing and issuance of bonds for airports; tax; payment; cancellation.

A tax to be fixed by ordinance shall be levied for each year to pay the interest and principal of the bonds as they become due and payable.

If any bonds or coupons are paid, the treasurer shall cause the word “paid” to be cut in them and otherwise cancel the bonds and coupons so paid.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 424, 425; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-424, 15.1-425; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-7-115, 15-7-116; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.